Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-8] Adoption of rules concerning
water resources by the commission. The commission shall adopt and enforce
such rules as may be necessary or convenient to administer this chapter. The
initial set of rules, subject to later amendment, revisions, or additions,
shall be adopted no later than two years after July 1, 1987. Rules shall be
adopted in conformity with chapter 91. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1987" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next